Washington statutes.
RCW 16.65.120

Disposition of proceeds of sale—Limitations on licensee.

A licensee shall not, except as provided in this chapter, pay the net proceeds or any part thereof arising from the sale of livestock consigned to the said licensee for sale, to any person other than the consignor of such livestock except upon an order from a court of competent jurisdiction, unless (1) such licensee has reason to believe that such person is the owner of the livestock; (2) such person holds a valid unsatisfied mortgage or lien upon the particular livestock, or (3) such person holds a written order authorizing such payment executed by the owner at the time of or immediately following the consignment of such livestock.

[ 1959 c 107 s 12.]